Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-2634
Registration and renewal fees; late registration fee.

(1) As a condition to registration or renewal of registration as required by sections 2-2628 to 2-2633, an applicant shall pay to the department a fee of two hundred dollars for each pesticide to be registered, except that the fee may be increased or decreased by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the Pesticide Act. In no event shall such fee exceed two hundred fifty dollars for each pesticide to be registered.

(2) All fees collected under subsection (1) of this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit as follows:

(a) Fifty dollars of such fee to the Noxious Weed Cash Fund as provided in section 2-958;

(b) Fifty dollars of such fee to the Buffer Strip Incentive Fund as provided in section 2-5106;

(c) Fifty-five dollars of such fee to the Natural Resources Water Quality Fund; and

(d) The remainder of such fee to the Pesticide Administrative Cash Fund.

(3) If a person fails to apply for renewal of registration before January 1 of any year, such person, as a condition to renewal, shall pay a late registration fee equal to twenty-five percent of the fee due and owing per month, not to exceed one hundred percent, for each product to be renewed in addition to the renewal fee. The purpose of the late registration fee is to cover the administrative costs associated with collecting fees, and all money collected as a late registration fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Pesticide Administrative Cash Fund.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 13;

Laws 1998, LB 1126, § 12;

Laws 2001, LB 329, § 4;

Laws 2006, LB 874, § 6;

Laws 2013, LB69, § 4;

Laws 2021, LB90, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 6.
March 17, 2026